California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 352, Sec. 10.   (SB 948)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.1.

Except as hereinafter provided, taxes collected on behalf of a local agency from a taxpayer whose property has been annexed to a second local agency but was not detached from the first local agency due to error or inadvertence shall be deemed to have been erroneously collected for purposes of Section 5096 if the governing board of the first local agency makes a finding by resolution that detachment proceedings were not commenced due to excusable neglect. If the first local agency is a fire protection district the governing body of the annexing agency may make the finding by resolution that detachment proceedings were not commenced following annexation due to excusable
 neglect. For purposes of determining the amount of the refund the property shall be deemed to have been detached from the first local agency on the date annexation proceedings were completed.

This section shall not apply to taxes which would be collectible under authority of Government Code Section 56492 even though the annexed property had been detached from the special district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.3.

(a) To dispose of certain lawsuits and assessment appeals that have been filed, and to preclude the filing of other claims relating to (1) the assessment, equalization, and assessability of certain possessory interests in publicly owned airports and (2) aircraft valuation and equalization by Alaska Airlines, Inc., American Airlines, Inc., Continental Airlines, Inc., Delta Air Lines, Inc., Federal Express Corporation, Northwest Airlines, Inc., Trans World Airlines, Inc., United Airlines, Inc., United Parcel Service, U.S. Airways, Inc., Wings
 West Airlines, Southwest Airlines, America West Airlines, in their own right or as successors in interest, counties shall provide future tax credits in the following amounts: Alameda $ 4,455,110Contra Costa 1,000El Dorado 1,000Fresno 264,630Humboldt 500Kern 33,540Los Angeles 18,335,720Monterey 148,560Orange 2,916,995Riverside 435,780Sacramento 1,070,185San Bernardino 1,991,405San Diego 4,262,610San
 Joaquin 1,000San Mateo 13,544,005Santa Barbara 167,880Santa Clara 2,369,080Solano 1,000(b) The credits identified in subdivision (a) will be allowed in equal amounts for the 1998–99 fiscal year to the 2002–03 fiscal year, inclusive, and may be credited by the counties against one or more tax bills of the airline entitled to the credit. The credits identified in subdivision (a) shall be allocated among the airlines in accordance with a schedule to be established and agreed upon by the airlines identified in subdivision (a). The airlines shall, through a designated representative, provide to each county listed in subdivision (a), before the effective date of this measure, the detail of the allocation of the credits among the various airlines.
 In no instance shall a county be required to provide a credit to any airline in any year that exceeds the total tax due from that airline to that county for that year. The airlines’ designated representative may submit revised instructions not later than June 30 preceding the beginning of the fiscal year in which the credits are to be adjusted, but in no event may the credit for any county in any year be increased beyond the levels set out in subdivisions (a) and (b) for any fiscal year.

(c) In addition to the credits provided in subdivision (a), each county shall allow a credit against any escape assessment upon certificated aircraft levied on or after April 1, 1998, under subdivision (b) of Section 401.15 for tax years up to and including the 1997–98 fiscal year to the extent the escape assessment is based upon the cost established in sale/leaseback or assignment of purchase rights transaction. The amount of the credit shall be equal to the
 tax on one-half of the value increase, plus interest and penalties attributable to use of the sale/leaseback or assignment of purchase rights transaction amount to determine value pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 401.15.

(d) Upon enrollment of any escape assessment contemplated in subdivision (a) of Section 401.15, the county assessor shall provide the county auditor with the information necessary to calculate the credit required in subdivision (c) of this section.

(e) No county shall be required to provide the credits specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) unless all airlines named in subdivision (a) who also have assessments in that county have entered into a settlement agreement or executed a waiver with that county. No county shall be required to provide the credits specified in subdivision (c) unless the airline otherwise entitled to that credit has entered into a
 settlement agreement or executed a waiver with that county. The settlement agreement or waiver shall include a waiver of all statutory and constitutional rights with respect to pending and future challenges to valuation and equalization of certificated aircraft through the 2003–04 fiscal year, provided that the assessments are established in conformance with Section 401.15, and all statutory and constitutional rights to challenge valuation, equalization and assessability of possessory interests in publicly owned airports (other than interests stated in a written agreement for terminal, cargo, hangar, automobile parking lots, storage and maintenance facilities, and other buildings and the land thereunder leased in whole or in part by an airline), provided that the valuations made for the 1998–99 fiscal year and thereafter are established in conformance with Section 107.9. At the discretion of a county, the airlines may be required to file waivers in that county in lieu of entering into a settlement agreement.
 Upon the execution of a settlement agreement or waiver by the airlines named in subdivision (a) that also have assessments in a county, that county listed in subdivision (a) shall be required to provide the credits set out in this section. Nothing in this section precludes claims concerning allocation of aircraft values.

(f) With respect to America West Airlines only, the waiver or settlement agreement required by subdivision (e) may exclude the claims that America West Airlines has already raised in the adversary proceedings in the bankruptcy proceeding entitled “In Re America West Airlines, Inc., Case No. 91-07505 PHX-RGM” against the Counties of Orange, San Bernardino, Sacramento, San Mateo, Alameda, and San Diego, provided that the settlement agreements or waivers under subdivision (e) provide that the resolution of any of America West’s adversary claims will have no legal effect for any tax year not at issue in those adversary proceedings.
 This section and Sections 107.9 and 401.15 do not abrogate, rescind, preclude, or otherwise affect any separate settlement agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this section between a county and an airline concerning the subject matter of this section and Sections 107.9 and 401.15 with respect to those tax years expressly settled by any agreement as so described. However, no settlement agreement as so described may be used to challenge the assessment and valuation provided by these sections for any tax year after the 1997–98 fiscal year or any tax year not expressly settled by that agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 86, Sec. 3.   Effective June 30, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.5.

Any taxes paid which were not erroneously or illegally collected under the law as it existed at the time of collection, but for which an exemption is provided by a retroactive constitutional amendment, shall be refunded after compliance with the provisions of this article, except that the claim for refund may be filed at any time within four years after the date such amendment became effective, or the date that this section became effective, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 532, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.7.

If taxes have been paid on property acquired by negotiated purchase by any public entity designated in Section 5081 after the commencement of the fiscal year for which the taxes are a lien on the property, the portion of such taxes which are allocable to that part of the fiscal year which begins on the date of apportionment determined pursuant to Section 5082 and made uncollectible if unpaid by virtue of Section 5086, shall be deemed erroneously collected and shall be refunded to the person who has paid the tax, where the person was not otherwise reimbursed for that portion of the taxes by the public entity which acquired the property.

Refunds under this section shall be applicable to taxes paid on either the secured or unsecured rolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

5096.8.

(a) In the case where a reduction in a base year value of real property results in a supplemental assessment for the value of the reduction being levied and charged to a subsequent owner of that property, that portion of any refund, due and owing to a former owner of that property, in the amount of the taxes on the reduction in base value after the former owner sold or transferred ownership of the property, shall be applied to satisfy that supplemental assessment.

(b) Any person claiming a refund due to a reduction in base year value shall certify under penalty of perjury
 whether he or she has sold or transferred ownership of the property to any other person, and if so, the date of sale or transfer.

(c) This section shall not apply in any county unless the board of supervisors adopts a resolution by majority vote to make the provisions of this section applicable in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 974, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.

(a) An order for a refund under this article shall not be made, except on a claim:

(1) Verified by the person who paid the tax, their guardian, executor, trustee, or administrator.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) or (4), filed within four years after making the payment sought to be refunded, within one year after the mailing of notice as prescribed in Section 2635, within the period agreed to as provided in Section 532.1, or within 60 days of the date of the notice prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4836, whichever is later.

(3) (A) Filed within one year, if an application for a reduction in an assessment or an application for equalization of an assessment has been filed pursuant to Section 1603 and the applicant does not state in the application that the application is intended to constitute a claim for a refund, of either of the following events, whichever occurs first:

(i) After the county assessment appeals board makes a final determination on the application for reduction in assessment or on the application for equalization of an escape assessment of the property, and mails a written notice of its determination to the applicant and the notice does not advise the applicant to file a claim for refund.

(ii) After the expiration of the time period specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1604 if
 the county assessment appeals board fails to hear evidence and fails to make a final determination on the application for reduction in assessment or on the application for equalization of an escape assessment of the property.

(B) Filed within six months, if an application for a reduction in an assessment or an application for equalization of an assessment has been filed pursuant to Section 1603 and the applicant does not state in the application that the application is intended to constitute a claim for a refund, after the county assessment appeals board makes a final determination on the application for reduction in assessment or on the application for equalization of an escape assessment, and mails a written notice of its determination to the applicant and the notice advises the applicant to file a claim for refund within six months of the
 date of the county assessment appeals board’s final determination.

(4) Filed within eight years after making the payment sought to be refunded, or within 60 days of the notice prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 4836, whichever is later, if the claim for refund is filed on or after January 1, 2015, and relates to the disabled veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5.

(b) An application for a reduction in an assessment filed pursuant to Section 1603 shall also constitute a sufficient claim for refund under this section if the applicant states in the application that the application is intended to constitute a claim for refund. If the applicant does not so state, the applicant may thereafter and within the period provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) file a
 separate claim for refund of taxes extended on the assessment which the applicant applied to have reduced pursuant to Section 1603 or 1604.

(c) If an application for equalization of an escape assessment is filed pursuant to Section 1603, a claim may be filed on any taxes resulting from the escape assessment or the original assessment to which the escape relates within the period provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an order for a refund under this article may be made without a claim pursuant to Section 5105, 5108, or 5109.

(e) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 656 of the Statutes of 2014 apply to claims for refund filed on or after January 1,
 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 2.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.02.

The claim shall be in writing, specifying:

(a) Whether the whole assessment is claimed to be void or, if only a part, what portion.

(b) The grounds on which the claim is founded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.03.

When a claim for refund of taxes is filed, the amount of tax computed on the portion of the assessment not in dispute shall not be impounded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.2.

Notwithstanding Sections 5096 and 5097, any taxes paid before or after delinquency may be refunded by the county tax collector or the county auditor, within four years after the date of payment, if:

(a) Paid more than once.

(b) The amount paid exceeds the amount due on the property as shown on the roll by an amount greater than twenty dollars ($20).

(c) The amount paid exceeds the amount due on the property as the result of corrections to the roll or cancellations after those taxes were paid.

(d) In any other case, where a claim for refund is made under penalty of perjury and is for an amount
 less than twenty dollars ($20).

(e) The amount paid exceeds the amount due on the property as the result of a reduction attributable to a hearing before an assessment appeals board or an assessment hearing officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 258, Sec. 6.   (SB 789)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5097.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, any taxes paid before or after delinquency may be refunded by the county tax collector or the county auditor, within eight years after the date of payment, if the amount paid exceeds the amount due on the property as the result of corrections to the roll that relate to the disabled veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 871, Sec. 4.   (SB 1458)   Effective September 30, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5099.

The refund ordered by the board of supervisors may include county taxes and taxes collected by county officers for a city or revenue district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.

The part of the refund representing amounts paid to the State shall be paid from the county general fund and, when the auditor renders the report which he is required to make to the Controller showing the amount due the State as of the last day of the month preceding the settlement which the county treasurer is required to have with the Controller, the auditor shall certify this amount refunded to the Controller, in the form prescribed by the Controller. On the next settlement of the county treasurer with the State, the Controller, if satisfied of the legality of the refund, shall give the county treasurer credit for the State’s portion of the refund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

Refunds ordered by the board of supervisors under this article in respect of county taxes shall be paid by warrant drawn upon the appropriate fund by the county auditor. Refunds ordered in respect of revenue districts, except chartered cities, may be paid by a warrant drawn by the county auditor, upon such available funds, if any, as the revenue district may have on deposit in the county treasury, or in the event such funds are insufficient, then out of funds subsequently accruing to such revenue district and on deposit in the county treasury. Refunds ordered in respect of chartered cities shall be paid in the manner provided for their payment in the charter or ordinances of the
 city. Neither any county nor its officers shall refund amounts on behalf of a revenue district from county funds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

If any payment may be refunded under this article and no claim is filed within the time allowed, the payment may be transferred to the county general fund on order of the board of supervisors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a taxpayer and the county or city and county may enter into a written settlement agreement to substitute credits against a taxpayer’s future tax liabilities for the payment by the county or city and county to that taxpayer of refunds of tax and any interest accrued thereon. Interest may continue to accrue upon a substituted credit until that credit has been fully offset against future tax liabilities. The authority of a county or city and county to provide for tax credits in accordance with this section shall be vested in
 that branch of the county or city and county government that is authorized to settle legal disputes on behalf of the county or city and county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 87, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

Any refund of taxes or assessments authorized pursuant to this article as a result of a reduction in the value of taxable property or as the result of corrections to the roll or cancellations after taxes or assessments were paid, may be paid to the latest recorded owner of that property as shown on the tax roll, rather than to the individual or entity who paid the amount of tax or assessment to be refunded, if both of the following conditions are met:

(a) There has been no transfer of the property during or since the fiscal year for which the taxes subject to refund were levied.

(b) The amount of the refund
 is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 3.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5097, an order for refund of taxes or assessments authorized pursuant to this article may be paid to the assessee of that property, or to the latest recorded owner of that property, as shown on the tax roll, without a claim for refund filed, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) There has been no transfer of the property during or since the fiscal year for which the taxes subject to refund were levied.

(2) The amount of the refund is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) This section shall become operative in a county
 only if the board of supervisors of the county adopts a resolution or ordinance approving the operation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 4.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

Where the taxes sought to be refunded or recovered have been paid after delinquency, the amount of penalties, interest or costs refundable or recoverable under this article shall be computed only on the taxes refunded or recovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

As used in this article, “tax” or “taxes” includes penalties, interest, and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 664.)
-------------------------------------------

5108.

Notwithstanding Section 5097, an order for refund of taxes or assessments authorized pursuant to this article may be paid to a disabled veteran or veteran’s surviving spouse, without a claim for refund filed, if the refund is due to a disabled veterans’ exemption described in Section 205.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 5.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5109.

Notwithstanding Section 5097, an order for refund of taxes or assessments authorized pursuant to this article may be paid to an assessee of that property, without a claim for refund filed, if the following conditions are met:

(a) The refund results from an exemption described in Sections 201 to 242, inclusive, with the exception of Section 205.5.

(b) The refund would not exist but for the assessee or qualifying occupant of the property meeting the requirements for an exemption described in subdivision (a).

(c) The amount of the refund is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 922, Sec. 6.   (AB 3134)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Refund Actions by Taxpayers [5140. - 5149.5.]

5140.

The person who paid the tax, his or her guardian or conservator, the executor of his or her will, or the administrator of his or her estate may bring an action only in the superior court, but not in the small claims division of the superior court, against a county or a city to recover a tax which the board of supervisors of the county or the city council of the city has refused to refund on a claim filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096) of this chapter. No other person may bring such an action; but if another should do so, judgment shall not be rendered for the plaintiff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 340, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5141.

(a) An action brought under this article, except an action brought under Section 5148, shall be commenced within six months from and after the date that the board of supervisors or city council rejects a claim for refund in whole or in part.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the board of supervisors or city council fails to mail notice of its action on a claim for refund within six months after the claim is filed, the claimant may, prior to mailing of notice by the board of supervisors or city council of its action on the claim, consider the claim rejected and bring an action under this article.

(c) If an applicant for the reduction of an assessment states in the application that the application is intended to constitute a claim for refund pursuant to Section 5097, the claim for refund shall be deemed denied on the date the final installment of the taxes extended on such assessment becomes delinquent or on the date the equalization board makes its final determination on the application, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1262, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5142.

(a) No action shall be commenced or maintained under this article, except under Section 5148, unless a claim for refund has first been filed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5096).

No recovery shall be allowed in any refund action upon any ground not specified in the refund claim.

(b) When the person affected or his or her agent and the assessor stipulate that an application involves only nonvaluation issues, they may file a stipulation with the county board of equalization stating that issues in dispute do not involve valuation questions. To the extent possible, the stipulation shall also indicate the parties’ agreement as to the assessment amounts that would result under their respective positions on the issue or issues in dispute. The board shall accept or reject the stipulation, with or without conducting a hearing on the stipulation. The filing of, and the acceptance by the board of, a stipulation shall be deemed compliance with the requirement that the person affected file and prosecute an application for reduction under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1601) of Part 3 in order to exhaust administrative remedies. However, the filing of, and the acceptance by the board of, a stipulation under this subdivision shall not excuse or waive the requirement of a timely filing of a claim for refund.

(c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to deprive the county board of equalization of jurisdiction over nonvaluation issues in the absence of a contrary stipulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 387, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5143.

If a claim for refund relates only to the validity of a portion of an assessment, an action may be brought under this article only as to that portion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5144.

If the court finds that an assessment is void in whole or in part, it shall render judgment for the plaintiff for the amount of the taxes paid on that portion of the assessment that is found to be void. The taxes paid on the portion of the assessment not found to be void shall constitute valid taxes which, if paid after delinquency, shall carry penalties, interest, and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

5145.

(a) Notwithstanding the fact that all taxes on property have not been paid in full, the owner of that property may bring an action under Section 5140 at any time within six months after the rejection of a claim for the first installment under an installment plan of redemption pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4216) of Chapter 3 of Part 7, if the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The first installment payment is made within six months of the delinquency of the taxes being paid by installments.

(2) If the balance of the unpaid tax liability remaining after the first installment payment has been made, plus penalties and interest thereon to the date of filing the actions, exceeds 6623 percent of the full value of the property on which the taxes are a lien, as of the last equalized assessment roll, the taxpayer shall post a bond with the county tax collector in a sum equal to that excess or, in the alternative, pledge other property with the county tax collector in that amount as security. The requirement for a bond or additional security specified in this paragraph shall terminate when the balance of unpaid tax liability remaining after a subsequent installment payment, plus penalties and interest thereon to the date of such subsequent installment payment, no longer exceeds 6623 percent of the full value of the property on which the taxes are a lien, as of the last equalized assessment roll. However, a new bond shall be posted or property pledged if, during the pendency of the action, the balance of unpaid tax liability, plus penalties and interest thereon, again exceeds 6623 percent of the full value.

(b) The right to maintain an action under this section shall terminate if there is a default of any obligation by the owner in the installment plan of redemption on the property.

(c) If the owner does not recover the amount of taxes in dispute in an action brought under this section, he or she shall pay additional interest to the county or city equal to the difference between the interest he or she has paid under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4216) of Chapter 3 of Part 7 and the amount of interest the county or city would have earned on the funds in the impound account on the entire amount of tax determined by the court to be due, if the amount had been paid in equal installments on the tax delinquency dates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 34.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

5145.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the fact that all taxes on a property have not been paid in full, the owner of that property may, subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (d), bring an action in accordance with Section 5140 at any time within six months after the rejection of a claim for the refund of the first installment that is paid under an installment plan for payment of escape assessments that is entered into pursuant to Section 4837.5.

(b) The right to maintain an action pursuant to this section shall terminate if there is a default on the part of the assessee with respect to any obligation in the installment plan for payment of the escape assessment.

(c) If the owner does not recover the amount of taxes in dispute in an action brought under this section, he or she shall pay additional interest to the county or city in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of interest he or she has paid under Section 506 and the amount of interest that the county or city would have earned in the impound account in connection with the entire amount of tax determined by the court to be due if that amount had been paid prior to delinquency.

(d) (1) This section shall not apply in cases where the penalty pursuant to Section 503 has been added to the escape assessment and upheld by the appeals board or the county board of equalization.

(2) This section shall apply to installment plans initiated by written requests filed with the tax collector on or after July 1, 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 941, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5146.

If all or any portion of the taxes sought to be recovered were collected by officers of the county for a city or cities, an action must be brought against the county for the recovery of those taxes. When an action is filed against a county for taxes collected by the county on behalf of a city or cities, the county shall give notice of that action to the city or cities within 30 days of the county’s receipt of the summons and complaint. A fee shall be payable by the assessee in an amount prescribed by the court to cover the reasonable costs incurred by a county or counties in giving the required notice. Any city receiving notice of the action filed against the county may, within 30 days of the receipt of that notice, intervene in that action. Whether or not a city intervenes in the action, any judgment rendered for an assessee shall be entered exclusively against the county; however, the county shall be entitled to recover separately from the city or cities and other tax entities those taxes collected by the county on behalf of the city or cities and other tax entities which are subject to refund to the assessee as a result of the judgment. Payment to the taxpayer upon the judgment and any interest thereon may be deferred by the county until the apportionment of property tax revenue next following the date of the judgment, or as the county and the taxpayer may otherwise agree. Interest shall accrue during any deferral period unless the county and taxpayer otherwise agree. The county may if it chooses to do so offset the amount of the judgment and interest recoverable by it from the city or cities and other tax entities against amounts held in the county treasury therefor or against amounts due and payable thereto, including, but not limited to, property tax apportionments. The amount of the fee required by this section shall not be recoverable by the assessee in the action and no judgment entered in the action in favor of the assessee shall provide for the recovery of the fee.

As used in this section, “county” includes a city and county.

If all or any portion of the taxes sought to be recovered were levied on state-assessed property, property which the board has found ineligible for the welfare exemption pursuant to Section 254.5, or property as to which the board has reviewed the assessment pursuant to Section 11 of Article XIII of the Constitution, the board shall be joined as a party to the action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5148 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1262, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5147.

(a) No refund action hereafter commenced shall be further prosecuted, and no further proceedings shall be had therein, and any refund action hereafter commenced shall be dismissed by the court in which the action was commenced, on the court’s own motion or on the motion of any defendant therein, unless the summons was issued and served and the return thereon was made within one year after the commencement of the action, except where the parties have filed a stipulation in writing that the time may be extended or the party against whom the action is prosecuted has made a general appearance in the action.

(b) For purposes of this section, none of the following constitutes a general appearance in the action:

(1) A stipulation pursuant to Section 583.230 of the Code of Civil Procedure extending the time within which service must be made.

(2) A motion to dismiss made pursuant to this chapter, whether joined with a motion to quash service or a motion to set aside a default judgment, or otherwise.

(3) An extension of time to plead after a motion to dismiss made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 126, Sec. 34.   Effective June 11, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5148.

Notwithstanding Section 5140, an action to recover taxes levied on state-assessed property arising out of a dispute as to an assessment made pursuant to Section 721, including a dispute as to valuation, assessment ratio, or allocation of value for assessment purposes, shall be brought under this section. In any action brought under this section, the following requirements shall apply:

(a) The action shall be brought by the state assessee. There shall be a single complaint with all parties joined therein with respect to disputes for any year.

(b) The action shall name the board and the county or counties. When a county is named which collected taxes on behalf of a city or cities, the county shall give notice of that action to the city or cities within 30 days of receipt of advice from the board of the action. A fee shall be payable by the state assessee in an amount prescribed by the court to cover the reasonable costs incurred by a county or counties in giving that notice. Any city receiving notice of the action filed against the board and the county may, within 30 days of the receipt of that notice, intervene in that action. Whether or not a city intervenes in the action, any judgment rendered for an assessee shall be entered exclusively against the county; however, the county shall be entitled to recover separately from the city or cities and other tax entities those taxes collected by the county on behalf of the city or cities and other tax entities which are subject to refund to the assessee as the result of the judgment. Payment to the taxpayer upon the judgment and any interest thereon may be deferred by the county until the apportionment of property tax revenue next following the date of the judgment, or as the county and the taxpayer may otherwise agree. Interest shall accrue during any deferral period unless the county and taxpayer otherwise agree. The county may if it chooses to do so offset the amount of the judgment and interest recoverable by it from the city or cities and other tax entities against amounts held in the county treasury therefor or against amounts due and payable thereto, including, but not limited to, property tax apportionments. The amount of the fee required by this section shall not be recoverable by the assessee in the action and no judgment entered in the action in favor of the assessee shall provide for the recovery of the fee.

As used in this section, “county” includes a city and county.

(c) Service of the summons and complaint shall be only upon the board. The board shall serve as agent of the defendant county or counties for the purpose of service of process. A fee shall be payable by the state assessee in an amount prescribed by the court to cover all reasonable costs incurred by the board while acting in its capacity as agent for the defendant counties.

(d) Venue of the action shall be in any county in which the Attorney General of California has an office or in which the state assessee has a significant presence.

(e) The action shall be limited in the case of valuation and allocation disputes to the grounds specified in the following:

(1) A petition for reassessment filed under Section 741, or any proceeding thereon.

(2) A petition for correction of allocated assessment filed under Section 747, or any proceeding thereon.

(f) A timely filed petition for reassessment or petition for correction of allocated assessment shall constitute a claim for refund if the petitioner states in the petition it is intended to so serve.

(g) The action shall be commenced only after payment of the taxes in issue and within four years after the latest of the dates that the State Board of Equalization mailed its decision or its written findings and conclusions on the following:

(1) A petition for reassessment filed under Section 741 and intended to constitute a claim for refund.

(2) A petition for correction of allocated assessment filed under Section 747 and intended to constitute a claim for refund.

(h) The action shall not be joined with any action filed under Section 5140. 

(i) Any refund of tax overpayments and any interest thereon, determined in any action brought under this section to be due shall be made by the defendant county or counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1262, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5149.

All courts wherein actions brought under this part (with the exclusion of actions brought under Section 5148) are or hereafter may be pending shall give those actions precedence over all other civil actions therein, except actions to which special precedence is given by law, in the matter of setting same for hearing or trial, and in hearing the same, to the end that all those actions shall be quickly heard and determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1372, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5149.5.

Where the taxes sought to be recovered have been paid after delinquency, the amount of penalties, interest or costs recoverable in actions brought under this article shall be computed only on the taxes recovered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Interest on Refunds [5150.5. - 5153.]

5150.5.
